test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-ciaha_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - čiähá: # á-stems
    čiähá+N+Sg+Nom: čiäḥá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Gen: čiäṿá
    čiähá+N+Sg+Ill: čiäḥán
    čiähá+N+Sg+Loc: čiäṿást
    čiähá+N+Sg+Com: čiävváin
    čiähá+N+Ess: čiähhán
    čiähá+N+Par: čiähhád
    čiähá+N+Pl+Nom: čiäṿáh
    čiähá+N+Pl+Gen: [čiäṿái, čiäˊṿ̣ái]
    čiähá+N+Pl+Acc: čiäṿáid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Ill: čiävváid
    čiähá+N+Pl+Loc: čiäṿáin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Com: čiäˊṿáiguin
    čiähá+N+Pl+Abe: čiäˊṿáittáá
